North Carolina statutes. Chapter 89C. Engineering and Land Surveying.
§ 89C-12.
Records and reports of Board; evidence.

The Board shall keep a record of its proceedings and a register of all applicants for licensure, showing for each the date of application, name, age, education, and other qualifications, place of business and place of residence, whether the applicant was rejected or a certificate of licensure granted, and the date licensure was rejected or granted. The books and register of the Board shall be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded by the Board, and a copy duly certified by the secretary of the Board under seal shall be admissible in evidence as if the original were produced. A roster showing the names and places of business and of residence of all licensed professional engineers and all licensed professional land surveyors shall be prepared by the secretary of the Board current to the month of January of each year. On or before the first day of May of each year, the Board shall submit to the Governor a report on its transactions for the preceding year, and shall file with the Secretary of State a copy of the report, together with a complete statement of the receipts and expenditures of the Board attested by the chair and the secretary and a copy of the roster of licensed professional engineers and professional land surveyors.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 8; C.S., s. 6055(i); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 10; 2000-140, s. 18; 2011-304, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-304, s. 3, effective June 26, 2011, deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “The roster shall be printed by the Board out of the Board’s fund and distributed as described in the Board’s rules.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 89C-13.
General requirements for licensure. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

Engineer Intern. — To be certified as an engineer intern, an applicant shall (i) pass the fundamentals of engineering examination and make application to the Board, (ii) be of good character and reputation, (iii) submit three character references to the Board, one of whom is a professional engineer, (iv) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (v) meet one of the following requirements:

Education. — Be a graduate of an EAC/ABET accredited engineering curriculum or of a related science curriculum which has been approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing.

Education and experience. — Be a graduate of an engineering curriculum or related science curriculum of four years or more, other than curriculums approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing in subdivision (1) of this subsection, and possess engineering experience satisfactory to the Board with a specific record of four or more years of progressive experience on engineering projects of a grade and character satisfactory to the Board.

(a1)

Engineer Applicant. —

To be licensed as a professional engineer, an applicant (i) shall be of good character and reputation, (ii) submit five character references to the Board, three of whom are professional engineers or individuals acceptable to the Board with personal knowledge of the applicant’s engineering experience, (iii) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (iv) meet the requirements related to education, examination, and experience set forth in this subsection. An applicant seeking licensure as a professional engineer shall meet the following requirements:

(1)

Education requirement. —

Possess one or more of the following educational qualifications:

A bachelor’s degree in engineering from an EAC/ABET accredited program or in a related science curriculum which has been approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing.

A bachelor’s degree in an engineering curriculum or related science curriculum of four years or more, other than curriculums approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing in sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.

A master’s degree in engineering from an institution that offers EAC/ABET accredited programs.

An earned doctoral degree in engineering from an institution that offers EAC/ABET accredited programs and in which the degree requirements are approved by the Board.

(2)

Examination requirements. —

Take and pass the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) examination. Take and pass the Principles and Practice of Engineering (PE) examination as provided by

G.S. 89C-15

, after having met the education requirement set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Experience requirement. — Present evidence satisfactory to the Board of a specific record of progressive engineering experience that is of a grade and character that indicates to the Board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering. The Board may adopt rules to specify the years of experience required based on educational attainment, provided the experience requirement for an applicant who qualifies under sub-subdivision (1)a. of this subsection shall be no less than four years and for an applicant who qualifies under sub-subdivision (1)b. of this subsection, no less than eight years.For purposes of this subsection, the term “EAC/ABET” means the Engineering Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology.

(a2)

Licensure by Comity or Endorsement. —

A person holding a certificate of licensure to engage in the practice of engineering, on the basis of comparable qualifications, issued to the person by a proper authority of a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or of any foreign country possessing credentials that, based on verifiable evidence, in the opinion of the Board, of a standard not lower than that in effect in this State at the time the certificate was issued, may upon application, be licensed without further examination, except as required to examine the applicant’s knowledge of laws, rules, and requirements unique to North Carolina.

(a3)

Long-Established Practice. —

A person with a specific record of 20 years or more of progressive experience on engineering projects of a grade and character which indicates to the Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering shall be admitted to the Principles and Practice of Engineering examination. Upon passing the examination, the person shall be granted a certificate of licensure to practice professional engineering in this State, provided the person is otherwise qualified.

(a4)

Exceptions. —

The following persons may apply for and be granted waiver of the fundamentals of engineering examination and admission to the principles and practice of engineering examination:

(1)

A full-time engineering faculty member who teaches in an approved engineering program offering a four-year or more degree approved by the Board. The faculty member applicant shall document that the degree meets the Board’s requirements.

(2)

A person possessing an earned doctoral degree in engineering from an institution in which the same discipline undergraduate engineering program has been accredited by EAC/ABET. The doctoral degree applicant shall document that the degree meets the Board’s requirements.

Land Surveyor Applicant. — The evaluation of a land surveyor applicant’s qualifications shall involve a consideration of the applicant’s education, technical, and land surveying experience, exhibits of land surveying projects with which the applicant has been associated, and recommendations by references. The land surveyor applicant’s qualifications may be reviewed at an interview if the Board determines it necessary. Educational credit for institute courses, correspondence courses, or other courses shall be determined by the Board.The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the Board that the applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional land surveyor:

To be certified as a land surveyor intern, an applicant shall (i) pass the fundamentals of land surveying examination and make application to the Board, (ii) be of good character and reputation, (iii) submit three character references to the Board, one of whom is a professional land surveyor, (iv) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (v) satisfy one of the following requirements related to education and experience:

Be a graduate of a surveying curriculum of four years or more or other equivalent curriculum in surveying approved by the Board.

Have rightful possession of an associate degree in surveying technology approved by the Board, a record satisfactory to the Board of four years of progressive practical experience, two years of which shall have been under a practicing professional land surveyor, and have satisfactorily passed a written and oral examination as required by the Board.

Have graduated from high school or completed a high school equivalency certificate with a record satisfactory to the Board of 10 years of progressive, practical experience, six years of which shall have been under a practicing licensed land surveyor, and have satisfactorily passed any oral and written examinations required by the Board.

(1a)

To be licensed as a professional land surveyor, an applicant shall (i) be of good character and reputation, (ii) submit five character references to the Board, three of whom are professional land surveyors or individuals acceptable to the Board, with personal knowledge of the applicant’s land surveying experience, (iii) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (iv) meet one of the following requirements:

a.

Rightful possession of a bachelor of science degree in surveying or other equivalent curricula, all approved by the Board and a record satisfactory to the Board of two years or more of progressive practical experience, one year of which shall have been under a practicing professional land surveyor if the applicant has successfully passed the first examination (Fundamentals of Surveying) on or before January 1, 2013, or if the applicant has not successfully passed the first examination on or before January 1, 2013, two years of which shall have been under a practicing professional land surveyor, and satisfactorily passing any oral and written examination required by the Board, all of which shall determine and indicate that the applicant is competent to practice land surveying. Upon passing the first examination and successful completion of the experience required by this subdivision, the applicant may apply to take the second examination (Principles and Practice of Land Surveying). An applicant who passes both examinations and completes the educational and experience requirements of this subdivision shall be granted licensure as a professional land surveyor.

b.

Rightful possession of an associate degree in surveying technology approved by the Board and a record satisfactory to the Board of four years of progressive practical experience, three years of which shall have been under a practicing licensed land surveyor if the applicant has successfully passed the first examination (Fundamentals of Surveying) on or before January 1, 2013, or if the applicant has not successfully passed the first examination on or before January 1, 2013, eight years of progressive practical experience, four years of which shall have been under a practicing professional land surveyor, and satisfactorily passing any written and oral examination required by the Board, all of which shall determine and indicate that the applicant is competent to practice land surveying. If the applicant has not successfully completed the first examination on or before January 1, 2013, the applicant may apply to the Board to take the first examination after obtaining the associate degree and completing four years of practical experience, two years of which shall have been under a practicing professional land surveyor at the first regularly scheduled examination thereafter. Upon passing the first examination and successfully completing the practical experience required under this subdivision, the applicant may apply to the Board to take the second examination (Principles and Practice of Land Surveying). An applicant who passes both examinations and successfully completes the educational and experience requirements of this subdivision shall be granted licensure as a professional land surveyor.

c.

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-118, s. 11.

Graduation from a high school or the completion of a high school equivalency certificate and a record satisfactory to the Board of seven years of progressive practical experience, six years of which shall have been under a practicing licensed land surveyor if the applicant has successfully passed the first examination (Fundamentals of Surveying) on or before January 1, 2013, or if the applicant has not successfully passed the first examination on or before January 1, 2013, 16 years of progressive practical experience, nine years of which shall have been under a practicing professional land surveyor, and satisfactorily passing any oral and written examinations required by the Board, all of which shall determine and indicate that the candidate is competent to practice land surveying. If the applicant has not successfully passed the first examination on or before January 1, 2013, the applicant may be qualified by the Board to take the first examination upon graduation from high school or the completion of a high school equivalency certificate and successfully completing 10 years of progressive practice experience, six of which shall have been under a practicing licensed land surveyor.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 977, s. 7.

Licensure by Comity or Endorsement. — A person holding a certificate of licensure to engage in the practice of land surveying issued on comparable qualifications from a state, territory, or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia, possessing credentials that, based on verifiable evidence, in the opinion of the Board, of a standard not lower than that in effect in this State at the time the certificate was issued, may upon application, be licensed without further examination, except to take any examinations as the Board requires to determine the applicant’s qualifications, but in any event, the applicant shall be required to pass an examination which shall include questions on laws, procedures, and practices pertaining to the practice of land surveying in North Carolina.

A licensed professional engineer who can satisfactorily demonstrate to the Board that the professional engineer’s formal academic training in acquiring a degree and field experience in engineering includes land surveying, to the extent necessary to reasonably qualify the applicant in the practice of land surveying, may apply for and may be granted permission to take the principles and practice of land surveying examination and the fundamentals of land surveying examination. Upon satisfactorily passing the examinations, the applicant shall be granted a license to practice land surveying in the State of North Carolina.

Professional Engineers in Land Surveying. — Any person presently licensed to practice professional engineering under this Chapter shall upon application be licensed to practice land surveying, providing a written application is filed with the Board within one year next after June 19, 1975.

Photogrammetrists. — Any person presently practicing photogrammetry with at least seven years of experience in the profession, two or more of which shall have been in responsible charge of photogrammetric mapping projects meeting National Map Accuracy Standards shall, upon application, be licensed to practice land surveying, provided:

The applicant submit certified proof of graduation from high school, high school equivalency, or higher degree;

The applicant submit proof of employment in responsible charge as a photogrammetrist practicing within the State of North Carolina to include itemized reports detailing methods, procedures, amount of applicant’s personal involvement and the name, address, and telephone numbers of the client for five projects completed by the applicant with the State. A final map for one of the five projects shall also be submitted;

Five references to the applicant’s character and quality of work, three of which shall be from professional land surveyors, are submitted to the Board; and

The application is submitted to the Board by July 1, 1999. After July 1, 1999, no photogrammetrist shall be licensed without meeting the same requirements as to education, length of experience, and testing required of all land surveying applicants.

Any person performing activities described in

G.S. 89C-3(7)

a.2. and 7. with at least seven years of experience in performing mapping science surveys, two or more of which have been in responsible charge of mapping science projects that meet the requirements of 21 NCAC 56.1608, shall, upon application, be licensed to practice surveying in their area of competence (mapping science) provided all of the following requirements are met:

The applicant submits certified proof of graduation from high school, high school equivalency, or higher degree.

The applicant submits proof of employment in responsible charge of mapping science projects within the State of North Carolina, including itemized reports detailing methods, procedures, amount of applicant’s personal involvement, and the name, address, and telephone numbers of the client for five projects completed by the applicant within the State. The applicant shall also submit a final map, report, or digital product for one of the five projects.

Five references as to the applicant’s character and quality of work, three of which shall be from professional land surveyors, are submitted to the Board.

The application is submitted to the Board by July 1, 2014. After July 1, 2014, no individual performing surveys described in 21 NCAC 56.1608 shall be licensed without meeting the same requirements as to education, length of experience, and testing required of all land surveying applications.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-98, s. 2 effective June 12, 2013.The Board shall require an applicant to submit exhibits, drawings, plats, or other tangible evidence of land surveying work executed by the applicant under proper supervision and which the applicant has personally accomplished or supervised.Land surveying encompasses a number of disciplines including geodetic surveying, hydrographic surveying, cadastral surveying, engineering surveying, route surveying, photogrammetric (aerial) surveying, and topographic surveying. A professional land surveyor shall practice only within the surveyor’s area of expertise.The Board shall require an applicant to submit exhibits, drawings, plats, or other tangible evidence of land surveying work executed by the applicant under proper supervision and which the applicant has personally accomplished or supervised.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 9; C.S., s. 6055(j); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 999, s. 2; 1957, c. 1060, ss. 2, 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 977, ss. 1-15; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 36.1; 1998-118, s. 11; 1998-217, s. 41; 2005-296, s. 1; 2011-304, s. 4; 2013-98, s. 2; 2016-105, s. 1.

§ 89C-13.
General requirements for licensure. [Effective July 1, 2022]

Engineer Intern. — To be certified as an engineer intern, an applicant shall (i) pass the fundamentals of engineering examination and make application to the Board, (ii) be of good character and reputation, (iii) submit three character references to the Board, one of whom is a professional engineer, (iv) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (v) meet one of the following requirements:

Education. — Be a graduate of an EAC/ABET accredited engineering curriculum or of a related science curriculum which has been approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing.

Education and experience. — Be a graduate of an engineering curriculum or related science curriculum of four years or more, other than curriculums approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing in subdivision (1) of this subsection, and possess engineering experience satisfactory to the Board with a specific record of four or more years of progressive experience on engineering projects of a grade and character satisfactory to the Board.

(a1)

Engineer Applicant. —

To be licensed as a professional engineer, an applicant (i) shall be of good character and reputation, (ii) submit five character references to the Board, three of whom are professional engineers or individuals acceptable to the Board with personal knowledge of the applicant’s engineering experience, (iii) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (iv) meet the requirements related to education, examination, and experience set forth in this subsection. An applicant seeking licensure as a professional engineer shall meet the following requirements:

(1)

Education requirement. —

Possess one or more of the following educational qualifications:

A bachelor’s degree in engineering from an EAC/ABET accredited program or in a related science curriculum which has been approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing.

A bachelor’s degree in an engineering curriculum or related science curriculum of four years or more, other than curriculums approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing in sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.

A master’s degree in engineering from an institution that offers EAC/ABET accredited programs.

An earned doctoral degree in engineering from an institution that offers EAC/ABET accredited programs and in which the degree requirements are approved by the Board.

(2)

Examination requirements. —

Take and pass the Fundamentals of Engineering (FE) examination. Take and pass the Principles and Practice of Engineering (PE) examination as provided by

G.S. 89C-15

, after having met the education requirement set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Experience requirement. — Present evidence satisfactory to the Board of a specific record of progressive engineering experience that is of a grade and character that indicates to the Board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering. The Board may adopt rules to specify the years of experience required based on educational attainment, provided the experience requirement for an applicant who qualifies under sub-subdivision (1)a. of this subsection shall be no less than four years and for an applicant who qualifies under sub-subdivision (1)b. of this subsection, no less than eight years.For purposes of this subsection, the term “EAC/ABET” means the Engineering Accreditation Commission of the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology.

(a2)

Licensure by Comity or Endorsement. —

A person holding a certificate of licensure to engage in the practice of engineering, on the basis of comparable qualifications, issued to the person by a proper authority of a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or of any foreign country possessing credentials that, based on verifiable evidence, in the opinion of the Board, of a standard not lower than that in effect in this State at the time the certificate was issued, may upon application, be licensed without further examination, except as required to examine the applicant’s knowledge of laws, rules, and requirements unique to North Carolina.

(a3)

Long-Established Practice. —

A person with a specific record of 20 years or more of progressive experience on engineering projects of a grade and character which indicates to the Board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering shall be admitted to the Principles and Practice of Engineering examination. Upon passing the examination, the person shall be granted a certificate of licensure to practice professional engineering in this State, provided the person is otherwise qualified.

(a4)

Exceptions. —

The following persons may apply for and be granted waiver of the fundamentals of engineering examination and admission to the principles and practice of engineering examination:

(1)

A full-time engineering faculty member who teaches in an approved engineering program offering a four-year or more degree approved by the Board. The faculty member applicant shall document that the degree meets the Board’s requirements.

(2)

A person possessing an earned doctoral degree in engineering from an institution in which the same discipline undergraduate engineering program has been accredited by EAC/ABET. The doctoral degree applicant shall document that the degree meets the Board’s requirements.

Land Surveyor Applicant. — The evaluation of a land surveyor applicant’s qualifications shall involve a consideration of the applicant’s education, technical, and land surveying experience, exhibits of land surveying projects with which the applicant has been associated, and recommendations by references. The land surveyor applicant’s qualifications may be reviewed at an interview if the Board determines it necessary. Educational credit for institute courses, correspondence courses, or other courses shall be determined by the Board.The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the Board that the applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional land surveyor:

Repealed by Session Laws 2022-1, s. 1(b), effective July 1, 2022, and applicable to applications for licensure on or after that date.

(1a)

To be licensed as a professional land surveyor, an applicant shall (i) be of good character and reputation, (ii) submit five character references to the Board, three of whom are professional land surveyors or individuals acceptable to the Board, with personal knowledge of the applicant’s land surveying experience, (iii) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (iv) meet one of the following requirements:

Rightful possession of a bachelor of science degree in surveying or other equivalent curricula, all approved by the Board and a record satisfactory to the Board of two years or more of progressive practical experience under a practicing professional land surveyor. Upon passing the first examination (Fundamentals of Land Surveying) and the second examination (Principles and Practice of Land Surveying) and satisfactorily passing any oral and written examination required by the Board, all of which shall determine and indicate that the applicant is competent to practice land surveying, an applicant who successfully completes the educational and experience requirements of this subdivision shall be granted licensure as a professional land surveyor.

Rightful possession of an associate degree in surveying technology approved by the Board and a record satisfactory to the Board of five years or more of progressive practical experience under a practicing professional land surveyor. Upon passing the first examination (Fundamentals of Land Surveying) and the second examination (Principles and Practice of Land Surveying) and satisfactorily passing any oral and written examination required by the Board, all of which shall determine and indicate that the applicant is competent to practice land surveying, an applicant who successfully completes the educational and experience requirements of this subdivision shall be granted licensure as a professional land surveyor.

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-118, s. 11.

Graduation from a high school or the completion of a high school equivalency certificate and a record satisfactory to the Board of nine years or more of progressive practical experience under a practicing professional land surveyor. Upon passing the first examination (Fundamentals of Land Surveying) and the second examination (Principles and Practice of Land Surveying) and satisfactorily passing any oral and written examination required by the Board, all of which shall determine and indicate that the applicant is competent to practice land surveying, an applicant who successfully completes the educational and experience requirements of this subdivision shall be granted licensure as a professional land surveyor.

d1.

Graduation from a high school or the completion of a high school equivalency certificate, completion of a Land Surveyor Apprenticeship, and a record satisfactory to the Board of seven years or more of progressive practical experience under a practicing professional land surveyor. Upon passing the first examination (Fundamentals of Land Surveying) and the second examination (Principles and Practice of Land Surveying) and satisfactorily passing any oral and written examination required by the Board, all of which shall determine and indicate that the applicant is competent to practice land surveying, an applicant who successfully completes the educational and experience requirements of this subdivision shall be granted licensure as a professional land surveyor.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 977, s. 7.

Licensure by Comity or Endorsement. — A person holding a certificate of licensure to engage in the practice of land surveying issued on comparable qualifications from a state, territory, or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia, possessing credentials that, based on verifiable evidence, in the opinion of the Board, of a standard not lower than that in effect in this State at the time the certificate was issued, may upon application, be licensed without further examination, except to take any examinations as the Board requires to determine the applicant’s qualifications, but in any event, the applicant shall be required to pass an examination which shall include questions on laws, procedures, and practices pertaining to the practice of land surveying in North Carolina.

A licensed professional engineer who can satisfactorily demonstrate to the Board that the professional engineer’s formal academic training in acquiring a degree and field experience in engineering includes land surveying, to the extent necessary to reasonably qualify the applicant in the practice of land surveying, may apply for and may be granted permission to take the principles and practice of land surveying examination and the fundamentals of land surveying examination. Upon satisfactorily passing the examinations, the applicant shall be granted a license to practice land surveying in the State of North Carolina.

Professional Engineers in Land Surveying. — Any person presently licensed to practice professional engineering under this Chapter shall upon application be licensed to practice land surveying, providing a written application is filed with the Board within one year next after June 19, 1975.

Photogrammetrists. — Any person presently practicing photogrammetry with at least seven years of experience in the profession, two or more of which shall have been in responsible charge of photogrammetric mapping projects meeting National Map Accuracy Standards shall, upon application, be licensed to practice land surveying, provided:

The applicant submit certified proof of graduation from high school, high school equivalency, or higher degree;

The applicant submit proof of employment in responsible charge as a photogrammetrist practicing within the State of North Carolina to include itemized reports detailing methods, procedures, amount of applicant’s personal involvement and the name, address, and telephone numbers of the client for five projects completed by the applicant with the State. A final map for one of the five projects shall also be submitted;

Five references to the applicant’s character and quality of work, three of which shall be from professional land surveyors, are submitted to the Board; and

The application is submitted to the Board by July 1, 1999. After July 1, 1999, no photogrammetrist shall be licensed without meeting the same requirements as to education, length of experience, and testing required of all land surveying applicants.

Any person performing activities described in

G.S. 89C-3(7)

a.2. and 7. with at least seven years of experience in performing mapping science surveys, two or more of which have been in responsible charge of mapping science projects that meet the requirements of 21 NCAC 56.1608, shall, upon application, be licensed to practice surveying in their area of competence (mapping science) provided all of the following requirements are met:

The applicant submits certified proof of graduation from high school, high school equivalency, or higher degree.

The applicant submits proof of employment in responsible charge of mapping science projects within the State of North Carolina, including itemized reports detailing methods, procedures, amount of applicant’s personal involvement, and the name, address, and telephone numbers of the client for five projects completed by the applicant within the State. The applicant shall also submit a final map, report, or digital product for one of the five projects.

Five references as to the applicant’s character and quality of work, three of which shall be from professional land surveyors, are submitted to the Board.

The application is submitted to the Board by July 1, 2014. After July 1, 2014, no individual performing surveys described in 21 NCAC 56.1608 shall be licensed without meeting the same requirements as to education, length of experience, and testing required of all land surveying applications.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-98, s. 2 effective June 12, 2013.The Board shall require an applicant to submit exhibits, drawings, plats, or other tangible evidence of land surveying work executed by the applicant under proper supervision and which the applicant has personally accomplished or supervised.Land surveying encompasses a number of disciplines including geodetic surveying, hydrographic surveying, cadastral surveying, engineering surveying, route surveying, photogrammetric (aerial) surveying, and topographic surveying. A professional land surveyor shall practice only within the surveyor’s area of expertise.The Board shall require an applicant to submit exhibits, drawings, plats, or other tangible evidence of land surveying work executed by the applicant under proper supervision and which the applicant has personally accomplished or supervised.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 9; C.S., s. 6055(j); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 999, s. 2; 1957, c. 1060, ss. 2, 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 977, ss. 1-15; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 2; 1995, c. 509, s. 36.1; 1998-118, s. 11; 1998-217, s. 41; 2005-296, s. 1; 2011-304, s. 4; 2013-98, s. 2; 2016-105, s. 1; 2022-1, s. 1(b).

§ 89C-14.
Application for licensure; license fees.

Application for licensure as a professional engineer or professional land surveyor shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Board. It shall contain statements made under oath, showing the applicant’s education and a detailed summary of the applicant’s technical and engineering or land surveying experience, and shall include the names and complete mailing addresses of the references, none of whom may be immediate members of the applicant’s family or members of the Board.The Board may accept the certified information on the copy of a current formal certificate of qualifications issued by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying in lieu of the same information that is required for the form prescribed and furnished by the Board.

An applicant for licensure who is required to take the written examination shall pay to the Board an application fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00). The Board may charge any fee necessary to defray the cost of any required examinations. The fee shall accompany the application. The fee for comity licensure of engineers and land surveyors who hold unexpired certificates in another state or a territory of the United States or in Canada shall be the total current fee as fixed by the Board.

The certification fee for a corporation is the amount set by the Board but shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00). The fee shall accompany the application. The certification fee for a business firm is the same as the fee for a corporation. The fee for renewal of a certificate of licensure of a corporation is the amount set by the Board but shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00). The fee for renewal of a certificate of licensure for a business firm is the same as the renewal fee for a corporation.

Should the Board deny the issuance of a certificate of licensure to any applicant, the unobligated portion of fees paid shall be returned by the Board to the applicant.

A candidate failing an examination may apply, and be considered by the Board, for reexamination at the end of six months. The Board shall make such reexamination charge as is necessary to defray the cost of the examination.A candidate with a combination of three failures or unexcused absences on an examination shall only be eligible after submitting a new application with appropriate application fee and documented evidence of actions taken by the candidate to enhance the candidate’s prospects for passing the exam. A candidate with a combination of three failures or unexcused absences may only be considered by the Board for reexamination at the end of 12 months following the third failure or unexcused absence. After the end of the 12-month period, the applicant may take the examination no more than once every calendar year.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 9; C.S., s. 6055(j); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1953, c. 999, s. 2; 1957, c. 1060, ss. 2, 3; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1981, c. 230; 1983, c. 183, ss. 1, 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 671, s. 5; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(k); 1998-118, s. 12; 2000-115, s. 1.